Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB63.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1310-B(a.1)(1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended to read:Section 1310-B. School safety and security training.* * *(a.1) Cyber charter school waiver or alternate training opportunity.--(1) A cyber charter school may waive or provide an alternative training opportunity to address the in-person training required under subsection (a)(1.1)(i) for any cyber charter school employee who [is not physically located in this Commonwealth and] exclusively provides instruction 1234567891011121314151617181920 remotely.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0063PN0052 - 2 - 123